Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-913
Drainage improvements; work completed; payment.

Payment for the work done under the provisions of section 31-912 shall be made monthly upon progress certificate of the engineer with ten percent of each estimate to be withheld until final completion and acceptance of said improvement.

Laws 1959, c. 132, § 13, p. 489.